Washington statutes.
RCW 27.48.010

Public purpose declared—Powers of counties and municipalities.

The storage, preservation and exhibit of historical materials, including, but not restricted to, books, maps, writings, newspapers, ancient articles, and tools of handicraft, antiques, artifacts, and relics is declared to be a public project carried on for public purpose and the legislative body of any county, city or town, may provide quarters therefor within the territorial limits thereof and may provide funds necessary for the proper operation of any such institution already in operation, or otherwise provide for the preservation of historical material covered by this chapter.

[ 1957 c 47 s 1; 1949 c 160 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 8265-9.]